Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2,111
Terms, defined.

As used in the Conservation and Preservation Easements Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Conservation easement shall mean a right, whether or not stated in the form of an easement, restriction, covenant, or condition in any deed, will, agreement, or other instrument executed by or on behalf of the owner of an interest in real property imposing a limitation upon the rights of the owner or an affirmative obligation upon the owner appropriate to the purpose of retaining or protecting the property in its natural, scenic, or open condition, assuring its availability for agricultural, horticultural, forest, recreational, wildlife habitat, or open space use, protecting air quality, water quality, or other natural resources, or for such other conservation purpose as may qualify as a charitable contribution under the Internal Revenue Code;

(2) Preservation easement shall mean a right, whether stated in the form of an easement, restriction, covenant, or condition in any deed, will, agreement, or other instrument executed by or on behalf of the owner of an interest in real property imposing a limitation upon the rights of the owner or an affirmative obligation upon the owner appropriate to the purpose of preserving the historical, architectural, archaeological, or cultural aspects of real property, or for such other historic preservation purpose as may qualify as a charitable contribution under the Internal Revenue Code; and

(3) Holder shall mean anyone acquiring a conservation or preservation easement by purchase, exchange, gift, or devise and having the right to enforce it by its terms, which may be:

(a) Any governmental body empowered to hold an interest in real property in this state under the laws of this state or the United States having among its purposes the subject matter of the easement;

(b) In the case of a conservation easement, any charitable corporation or trust whose purposes include retaining or protecting the natural, scenic, or open condition of real property, assuring its availability for agricultural, horticultural, forest, recreational, wildlife habitat, or open space use or protecting air quality, water quality, or other natural resources; or

(c) In the case of a preservation easement, any charitable corporation or trust whose purposes include the preservation of the historical, architectural, archaeological, or cultural aspects of real property.

Laws 1981, LB 173, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 574, § 61.